apertium-nhi.nhi.lexc
LEXICON CaFut
%<s_sg1%>catqui%<cop%>%<fut%>:ni%>izqui # ;
%<s_sg2%>catqui%<cop%>%<fut%>:ti%>izqui # ;
%<s_sg3%>catqui%<cop%>%<fut%>:izqui # ;
%<s_pl1%>catqui%<cop%>%<fut%>:ti%>izque # ; ! Dir/LR
%<s_pl2%>catqui%<cop%>%<fut%>:ni%>izque # ; ! Dir/LR
%<s_pl3%>catqui%<cop%>%<fut%>:izque # ;  ! Dir/LR
%<s_pl1%>catqui%<cop%>%<fut%>:ti%>izqueh # ;
%<s_pl2%>catqui%<cop%>%<fut%>:ni%>izqueh # ;
%<s_pl3%>catqui%<cop%>%<fut%>:izqueh # ;

! non-cop
%<s_sg1%>catqui%<v%>%<iv%>%<fut%>:ni%>izqui # ;
%<s_sg2%>catqui%<v%>%<iv%>%<fut%>:ti%>izqui # ;
%<s_sg3%>catqui%<v%>%<iv%>%<fut%>:izqui # ;
%<s_pl1%>catqui%<v%>%<iv%>%<fut%>:ti%>izque # ; ! Dir/LR
%<s_pl2%>catqui%<v%>%<iv%>%<fut%>:ni%>izque # ; ! Dir/LR
%<s_pl3%>catqui%<v%>%<iv%>%<fut%>:izque # ;  ! Dir/LR
%<s_pl1%>catqui%<v%>%<iv%>%<fut%>:ti%>izqueh # ;
%<s_pl2%>catqui%<v%>%<iv%>%<fut%>:ni%>izqueh # ;
%<s_pl3%>catqui%<v%>%<iv%>%<fut%>:izqueh # ;

LEXICON CaCni
%<s_sg1%>catqui%<cop%>%<cni%>:ni%>izquia # ;
%<s_sg2%>catqui%<cop%>%<cni%>:ti%>izquia # ;
%<s_sg3%>catqui%<cop%>%<cni%>:izquia # ;
%<s_pl1%>catqui%<cop%>%<cni%>:ti%>izquia # ; !Dir/LR
%<s_pl2%>catqui%<cop%>%<cni%>:ni%>izquia # ; ! Dir/LR
%<s_pl3%>catqui%<cop%>%<cni%>:izquia # ;  ! Dir/LR
%<s_pl1%>catqui%<cop%>%<cni%>:ti%>izquiah # ;
%<s_pl2%>catqui%<cop%>%<cni%>:ni%>izquiah # ;
%<s_pl3%>catqui%<cop%>%<cni%>:izquiah # ;

! non-cop
%<s_sg1%>catqui%<v%>%<iv%>%<cni%>:ni%>izquia # ;
%<s_sg2%>catqui%<v%>%<iv%>%<cni%>:ti%>izquia # ;
%<s_sg3%>catqui%<v%>%<iv%>%<cni%>:izquia # ;
%<s_pl1%>catqui%<v%>%<iv%>%<cni%>:ti%>izquia # ; !Dir/LR
%<s_pl2%>catqui%<v%>%<iv%>%<cni%>:ni%>izquia # ; ! Dir/LR
%<s_pl3%>catqui%<v%>%<iv%>%<cni%>:izquia # ;  ! Dir/LR
%<s_pl1%>catqui%<v%>%<iv%>%<cni%>:ti%>izquiah # ;
%<s_pl2%>catqui%<v%>%<iv%>%<cni%>:ni%>izquiah # ;
%<s_pl3%>catqui%<v%>%<iv%>%<cni%>:izquiah # ;

LEXICON YoPres
%<s_sg1%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:ni%>yo # ;
%<s_sg2%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:ti%>yo # ;

%<s_sg2%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<opt%>:xi%>yo # ;
%<s_sg2%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<opt%>:ti%>yo # ;

%<s_sg3%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:yohui # ;
%<s_pl1%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:ti%>yohue # ; ! Dir/LR
%<s_pl2%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:ni%>yohue # ;! Dir/LR
%<s_pl3%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:yohue # ; ! Dir/LR
%<s_pl1%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:ti%>yohueh # ;
%<s_pl2%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:ni%>yohueh # ;
%<s_pl3%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:yohueh # ;


%<s_pl1%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<opt%>:ti%>ya%>can # ;
%<s_pl2%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<opt%>:xi%>ya%>can # ;
%<s_pl3%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:ya%>can # ;


%<s_sg3%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:yuhui # ;! Dir/LR
%<s_pl1%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:ti%>yuhue # ;! Dir/LR
%<s_pl2%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:ni%>yuhue # ;! Dir/LR
%<s_pl3%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:yuhue # ;! Dir/LR
%<s_pl1%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:ti%>yuhueh # ;! Dir/LR
%<s_pl2%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:ni%>yuhueh # ;! Dir/LR
%<s_pl3%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:yuhueh # ;! Dir/LR

! TODO: optative forms
! %<s_sg1%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:ni%>yo # ;
! %<s_sg2%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:ti%>yo # ;

! %<s_sg2%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<opt%>:xi%>yo # ;
! %<s_sg2%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<opt%>:ti%>yo # ;

! %<s_sg3%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:yohui # ;
! %<s_pl1%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:ti%>yohue # ;
! %<s_pl2%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:ni%>yohue # ;! Dir/LR
! %<s_pl3%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:yohue # ; ! Dir/LR
! %<s_pl1%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:ti%>yohueh # ;
! %<s_pl2%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:ni%>yohueh # ;
! %<s_pl3%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:yohueh # ;

LEXICON YoPret
%<s_sg1%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pret%>:ni%>ya # ;
%<s_sg2%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pret%>:ti%>ya # ;
%<s_sg3%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pret%>:ya # ;

%<s_sg1%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pret%>:ni%>yah # ;! Dir/LR
%<s_sg2%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pret%>:ti%>yah # ;! Dir/LR
%<s_sg3%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pret%>:yah # ;! Dir/LR

%<s_pl1%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pret%>:ti%>yahque # ;! Dir/LR
%<s_pl2%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pret%>:ni%>yahque # ;! Dir/LR
%<s_pl3%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pret%>:yahque # ;! Dir/LR

%<s_pl1%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pret%>:ti%>yahqueh # ;
%<s_pl2%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pret%>:ni%>yahqueh # ;
%<s_pl3%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pret%>:yahqueh # ;

LEXICON YoImpf
%<s_sg1%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<impf%>:ni%>yaya # ;
%<s_sg2%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<impf%>:ti%>yaya # ;
%<s_sg3%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<impf%>:yaya # ;
%<s_pl1%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<impf%>:ti%>yaya # ;! Dir/LR
%<s_pl2%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<impf%>:ni%>yaya # ;! Dir/LR
%<s_pl3%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<impf%>:yaya # ;! Dir/LR
%<s_pl1%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<impf%>:ti%>yayah # ;
%<s_pl2%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<impf%>:ni%>yayah # ;
%<s_pl3%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<impf%>:yayah # ;

LEXICON YoFut
%<s_sg1%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<fut%>:ni%>yaz # ;
%<s_sg2%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<fut%>:ti%>yaz # ;
%<s_sg3%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<fut%>:yaz # ;
%<s_pl1%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<fut%>:ti%>yazque # ;! Dir/LR
%<s_pl2%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<fut%>:ni%>yazque # ;! Dir/LR
%<s_pl3%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<fut%>:yazque # ;! Dir/LR
%<s_pl1%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<fut%>:ti%>yazqueh # ;
%<s_pl2%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<fut%>:ni%>yazqueh # ;
%<s_pl3%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<fut%>:yazqueh # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! Continuation Verb Endings
!--------------------------
! * PresentTense
! * Imperfect
!   (In classical nahuatl, this is the same as PresentTense base (Base 1). In
!    nhi, verbs ending in 'ia' or 'oa' drop the first of those two ('i' and
!    'o', respectively), as is done in Base 1 in classical Nahuatl.
!    for eg:
!       ilhuia, "contar/decir"
!       classical:      o-ni-mitz-ilhuia-ya
!       western sierra: o-ni-mitz-ilhua-ya
!       "Yo te (lo) decía"

! * Base2Suffixes
!       * Preterite
!       * Pluperfect

! * Base3Suffixes
!       * Future
!       * Counterfactual
!       * Optative
!       * SuffixalDirectional

LEXICON ZV-Stem ! zero args
! llover
quiyahui%<v%>%<iv%>:quiyahui%>  PresentTense ;
quiyahui%<v%>%<iv%>:quiyahui%>  Imperfect ;
quiyahui%<v%>%<iv%>:quiyauh%>   Durative ;
quiyahui%<v%>%<iv%>:quiyauh%>   Base2Suffixes ;
quiyahui%<v%>%<iv%>:quiyahui%>  Base3Suffixes ;

! llover (alternancia)
quiyohui%<v%>%<iv%>:quiyohui%>  PresentTense ;
quiyohui%<v%>%<iv%>:quiyohui%>  Imperfect ;
quiyohui%<v%>%<iv%>:quiyoh%>   Durative ;
quiyohui%<v%>%<iv%>:quiyoh%>   Base2Suffixes ;
quiyohui%<v%>%<iv%>:quiyohui%>  Base3Suffixes ;


LEXICON Base2Suffixes
              Preterite ;
              Pluperfect ;


LEXICON Base3Suffixes
              Future ;
              Conditional ;
              Counterfactual ;
              Optative ;
              ! Applicative ;
              DirectionToward ;
              DirectionAway ;
              
              ! TODO Suffixal Directionals (Perfective/Imperfective/Optative)

LEXICON AuxiliarySuffixes
AuxContin ;
AuxQuiza ;
AuxHuitzi ;
AuxCome ;

LEXICON AuxCome
@D.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@+huitz%<vaux%>:@D.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@ti%>huitz # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@+huitz%<vaux%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@ti%>huitz%>queh # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@+huitz%<vaux%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@ti%>huitz%>que # ; ! Dir/LR 

LEXICON AuxNiqui
@D.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@+niqui%<vaux%>:@D.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@niqui # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@+niqui%<vaux%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@niqui%>h # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@+niqui%<vaux%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@niqui%> # ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON AuxContin ! Auxiliar de continuidad
@D.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@+nimi%<vaux%>:@D.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@ti%>nimi # ;
@D.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@+nimi%<vaux%>%<fut%>:@D.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@ti%>nimi%>z # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@+nimi%<vaux%>%<fut%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@ti%>nimi%>zque # ;! Dir/LR
@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@+nimi%<vaux%>%<fut%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@ti%>nimi%>zqueh # ;

@D.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@+nimi%<vaux%>%<impf%>:@D.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@ti%>nimi%>ya # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@+nimi%<vaux%>%<impf%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@ti%>nimi%>yah # ;

LEXICON IV-Stem
xotla%<v%>%<iv%>:xotla%>  Base2Suffixes ;
xotla%<v%>%<iv%>:xotla%>  Base3Suffixes ;
ihtlacahui%<v%>%<iv%>:ihtlacauh%>  Base2Suffixes;
ihtlacahui%<v%>%<iv%>:ihtlacahui%>  Base3Suffixes;
chanchihua%<v%>%<iv%>:chanchiuh%>  Base2Suffixes;
chanchihua%<v%>%<iv%>:chanchihua%>  Base3Suffixes;
hueyiya%<v%>%<iv%>:hueyix%> Base2Suffixes ; 
hueyiya%<v%>%<iv%>:hueyiya%> Base3Suffixes ;
hueyicamohtia%<v%>%<iv%>:hueyicamohti%{H%}%{P%}%>  Base2Suffixes;
hueyicamohtia%<v%>%<iv%>:hueyicamohti%>  Base3Suffixes;
tona%<v%>%<iv%>:ton%> Base2Suffixes ;
tona%<v%>%<iv%>:ton%> Base3Suffixes ;
tlacati%<v%>%<iv%>:tlacat%>  Base2Suffixes;
tlacati%<v%>%<iv%>:tlacati%>  Base3Suffixes;
tici%<v%>%<iv%>:tiz%>  Base2Suffixes;
tici%<v%>%<iv%>:tici%>  Base3Suffixes;
elmoyahui%<v%>%<iv%>:elmoyauh%>  Base2Suffixes;
elmoyahui%<v%>%<iv%>:elmoyahui%>  Base3Suffixes;
tlaciceya%<v%>%<iv%>:tlaceceya%>  Base2Suffixes; ! Dir/LR
tlaciceya%<v%>%<iv%>:tlaceceya%>  Base3Suffixes;  ! Dir/LR
cohtzahtzi%<v%>%<iv%>:cohtzahtz%>  Base2Suffixes;
cohtzahtzi%<v%>%<iv%>:cohtzahtzi%>  Base3Suffixes;
chicahui%<v%>%<iv%>:chicauh%>  Base2Suffixes;
chicahui%<v%>%<iv%>:chicahui%>  Base3Suffixes;
palti%<v%>%<iv%>:palti%{H%}%{P%}%>  Base2Suffixes;
palti%<v%>%<iv%>:palti%>  Base3Suffixes;
ehco%<v%>%<iv%>:ehco%>     Base2Suffixes ;
ehco%<v%>%<iv%>:ehco%>     Base3Suffixes ;
LEXICON TV-Stem
imaginaroa%<v%>%<tv%>:imaginaro%{P%}%>  Base2Suffixes;
mohmohtia%<v%>%<tv%>:mohmohti%>  Base3Suffixes;
cuatiqui%<v%>%<iv%>:cuatic%>  Base2Suffixes;
chiya%<v%>%<tv%>:chiya%>  Base3Suffixes;
panahuia%<v%>%<tv%>:panahui%{H%}%{P%}%>  Base2Suffixes ;
yahualoa%<v%>%<tv%>:yahualo%>  Base3Suffixes;
tilanilia%<v%>%<tv%>:tilanili%{H%}%{P%}%>  Base2Suffixes ;
tiquitiltia%<v%>%<tv%>:tiquitilti%>  Base3Suffixes ;
tlahtlawahtihtia%<v%>%<tv%>:tlahtlawahtihti%{H%}%{P%}%>  Base2Suffixes ;
titiqui%<v%>%<iv%>:titiqui%>  Base3Suffixes;
nahnahua%<v%>%<iv%>:nahnahua%>  Base2Suffixes;
tetzahuia%<v%>%<tv%>:tetzahui%>  Base3Suffixes;
ciyouhtia%<v%>%<tv%>:ciyauhti%{H%}%{P%}%>  Base2Suffixes;
regresaroa%<v%>%<tv%>:regresaro%>  Base3Suffixes;
ahhuatia%<v%>%<tv%>:ahhuati%{H%}%{P%}%>  Base2Suffixes;
aprenderoa%<v%>%<tv%>:aprendero%>  Base3Suffixes;
abandonaroa%<v%>%<tv%>:abandonaro%{P%}%>  Base2Suffixes;
felicitaroa%<v%>%<tv%>:felicitaro%>  Base3Suffixes;
conservaroa%<v%>%<tv%>:conservaroh%>  Base2Suffixes;
ahcoitta%<v%>%<tv%>:ahcoita%>     Base2Suffixes ;
nextia%<v%>%<tv%>:nexti%>  Base3Suffixes;
yacatitia%<v%>%<tv%>:yacatiti%{H%}%{P%}%>  Base2Suffixes ;
xihuintia%<v%>%<tv%>:xihuinti%>  Base3Suffixes ;
mohtia%<v%>%<tv%>:mohti%{H%}%{P%}%>  Base2Suffixes ;
enviaroa%<v%>%<tv%>:enviaro%>   Base3Suffixes ;
piya%<v%>%<tv%>:pix%>   Base2Suffixes ;
icuiya%<v%>%<tv%>:icuiya%>  Base3Suffixes ;
quixtia%<v%>%<tv%>:quixti%{H%}%{P%}%>  Base2Suffixes;
aquixtia%<v%>%<tv%>:aquixti%>           Base3Suffixes;
tlazohtla%<v%>%<tv%>:tlazohtla%>  Base2Suffixes;
tamachihua%<v%>%<tv%>:tamachihua%>  Base3Suffixes;
cahua%<v%>%<tv%>:cauh%>  Base2Suffixes;
cahcahua%<v%>%<tv%>:cahcahua%>  Base3Suffixes;
cacaqui%<v%>%<tv%>:cacac%>  Base2Suffixes;
caxiti%<v%>%<tv%>:caxiti%>  Base3Suffixes;
cocoa%<v%>%<tv%>:coco%{P%}%>  Base2Suffixes;
conservaroa%<v%>%<tv%>:conservaro%>  Base3Suffixes;
nohnotza%<v%>%<tv%>:nohnotz%> Base2Suffixes ; 
nonotza%<v%>%<tv%>:nonotza%> Base3Suffixes ;
tlancua%<v%>%<tv%>:tlancuah%>  Base2Suffixes;
nacascua%<v%>%<tv%>:nacascua%>  Base3Suffixes;
cuica%<v%>%<tv%>:cuica%>  Base2Suffixes;
cuicuipa%<v%>%<tv%>:cuicuipa%>  Base3Suffixes;
ehua%<v%>%<tv%>:euh%>  Base2Suffixes;
cauhtehua%<v%>%<tv%>:cauhtehua%>  Base3Suffixes;
pohuia%<v%>%<tv%>:pohui%{H%}%{P%}%>  Base2Suffixes;
huahhuitia%<v%>%<tv%>:huahhuiti%>  Base3Suffixes;
leeroa%<v%>%<tv%>:leeroh%>  Base2Suffixes;
machilia%<v%>%<tv%>:machili%>  Base3Suffixes;
mana%<v%>%<tv%>:man%> Base2Suffixes ;
namaca%<v%>%<tv%>:namaca%>  Base3Suffixes;
pahpaca%<v%>%<tv%>:pahpaca%>  Base2Suffixes; ! Dir/LR
napaloa%<v%>%<tv%>:napalo%>  Base3Suffixes;
ahcicamati%<v%>%<tv%>:ahcicamat%>  Base2Suffixes;
tlami%<v%>%<tv%>:tlami%>  Base3Suffixes;
caltichoa%<v%>%<tv%>:calticho%{P%}%>  Base2Suffixes;
hueyilia%<v%>%<tv%>:hueyili%>  Base3Suffixes ;
hueyitilia%<v%>%<tv%>:hueyitili%{H%}%{P%}%>  Base2Suffixes ;
tzilinia%<v%>%<tv%>:tzilini%>  Base3Suffixes;
zotlahua%<v%>%<tv%>:zotlauh%>  Base2Suffixes;
LEXICON TV2-Stem
choquilia%<v%>%<tv%>:choquili%>  Base3Suffixes ;
cohuia%<v%>%<tv%>:cohui%{H%}%{P%}%>  Base2Suffixes;
uilia%<v%>%<tv%>:uili%>  Base3Suffixes ;
